Wisconsin, session 2025, AB748.
do enact as follows:AB748,11Section 1. 97.29 (1) (he) of the statutes is created to read:AB748,2,4297.29 (1) (he) “Nonpotentially hazardous food” means prepared food that does 3not require time and temperature control for safety to limit pathogenic 4microorganism growth or toxin formation.AB748,25Section 2. 97.29 (2) (b) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 97.29 (2) (b) 1r.AB748,36Section 3. 97.29 (2) (b) 1g. of the statutes is created to read:AB748,2,8797.29 (2) (b) 1g. In this paragraph, “person” includes a collection of 8individuals residing in a household.AB748,49Section 4. 97.29 (2) (b) 2. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB748,2,121097.29 (2) (b) 2. (intro.) A person is not required to obtain a license under this 11section to sell at retail food products that the person prepares and cans at in the 12person’s home in this state if all of the following apply:AB748,513Section 5. 97.29 (2) (b) 2. b., c., d. and e. of the statutes are repealed.AB748,614Section 6. 97.29 (2) (b) 2. f. of the statutes is created to read:AB748,2,161597.29 (2) (b) 2. f. The person complies with all applicable requirements under 16sub. (7). AB748,717Section 7. 97.29 (2) (b) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB748,2,201897.29 (2) (b) 3. A person is not required to obtain a license under this section 19to sell at retail food products that the person prepares in the person’s home in this 20state if all of the following apply:AB748,2,2121a. The food products are nonpotentially hazardous foods.AB748,2,2222b. The person complies with all applicable requirements under sub. (7). AB748,823Section 8. 97.29 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB748,3,2197.29 (7) Registration and other requirements for certain persons 2who prepare food at home. (a) In this subsection:AB748,3,531. “Cottage food producer” means any home producer who, in the immediately 4preceding calendar year, had gross sales of food products described in subd. 2. a. 5and b. of at least $10,000 but less than $40,000.AB748,3,762. “Home producer” means a person who, in the person’s home in this state, 7does any of the following:AB748,3,98a. Prepares and cans food products that are pickles or other processed 9vegetables or fruits with an equilibrium pH value of 4.6 or lower.AB748,3,1010b. Prepares food products that are nonpotentially hazardous foods.AB748,3,11113. “Person” includes a collection of individuals residing in a household.AB748,3,14124. “Small producer” means any home producer who, in the immediately 13preceding calendar year, had gross sales of food products described in subd. 2. a. 14and b. of less than $10,000.AB748,3,1915(b) To be eligible for a licensing exemption under sub. (2) (b) 2. or 3., a home 16producer shall first register with the department under this paragraph. The 17department shall issue a registration number to each registered home producer, 18except that, upon request, the department may register and issue one registration 19number to multiple individuals residing in a household.AB748,3,2120(c) An application for registration under par. (b) shall include all of the 21following information:AB748,3,23221. The name of the home producer and, if different, the home producer’s 23business name.AB748,4,2242. The physical address of the home producer’s home where the activities 1described in par. (a) 2. a. or b. occur and the physical address of the home producer’s 2business location, if applicable.AB748,4,433. A complete list of all food products sold at retail under the exemption under 4sub. (2) (b) 2. or 3.AB748,4,554. For each product identified in subd. 3., a complete ingredient list.AB748,4,76(d) A home producer may sell food products under the licensing exemption 7under sub. (2) (b) 2. or 3. only if all of the following apply:AB748,4,1081. The home producer sells the food products directly to consumers at the 9physical address of the home producer’s business, by delivery, or at a community or 10social event or a farmers' market in this state.AB748,4,17112. Each container of food product that is sold is labeled with the name of the 12home producer who prepared the food product, the home producer’s registration 13number issued under par. (b), the date on which the food product was prepared, the 14statement “This product was made in a private home.”, and a list of ingredients in 15descending order of prominence. If any ingredient originates from milk, eggs, fish, 16crustacean shellfish, tree nuts, wheat, peanuts, sesame, or soybeans, the list of 17ingredients shall include the common name of the ingredient.AB748,4,20183. The home producer maintains in effect a policy of comprehensive general 19liability insurance, issued by an insurer authorized to transact business in this 20state.AB748,4,23214. If the home producer is a small producer, the home producer displays a sign 22at the place of sale stating: “These food products are homemade and not subject to 23state inspection.”AB748,5,2245. If the home producer is a cottage food producer, at least one person in the 1household in which the food products were prepared holds a certificate of food 2protection practices under s. 97.33 and was involved in preparing the food products. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab748 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab748 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB748 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB748 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB748: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting